Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
SIMPLIFIED PROCEDURES IN THE COUNTY COURT

16-2-101. Misdemeanor and petty offense procedures - statement of purpose.

In order to provide a simple and expeditious method for the prosecution of misdemeanors and petty offenses in county courts but one which also guarantees to the defendant his constitutional rights, the general assembly does hereby establish a simplified criminal procedure for misdemeanors and petty offenses to be used under the circumstances set forth in this code in sections 16-2-102 to 16-2-114.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 193, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-101.

16-2-102. Definitions.

As used in sections 16-2-104 to 16-2-114, "summons and complaint" means a document combining the functions of both a summons and a complaint.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 193, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-102.

16-2-103. Application of article.

Sections 16-2-102 to 16-2-114 apply only to the prosecution of misdemeanors and petty offenses in county courts under simplified procedure and have no application to misdemeanors or petty offenses prosecuted in other courts or to felonies.

Any matter arising in a proceeding under simplified procedure not specifically covered by sections 16-2-102 to 16-2-114 shall be subject to the other provisions of this code and any other applicable statute or court rule or, in the absence of such statute or court rule, to the application of common law principles. In any case due regard shall be had for speed and simplicity.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 193, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-103.

16-2-104. Issuance of summons and complaint.

A summons and complaint may be issued by any peace officer for an offense constituting a misdemeanor or a petty offense committed in the peace officer's presence or, if not committed in the peace officer's presence, that the peace officer has probable cause to believe was committed and probable cause to believe was committed by the person charged. Except for penalty assessment notices, which must be handled pursuant to the procedures set forth in section 16-2-201 or 16-2.3-102, a copy of a summons and complaint so issued must be filed immediately with the county court before which appearance is required, and a second copy must be given to the district attorney or deputy district attorney for the county.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 193, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-104.

L. 73:

p. 498, § 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3160, § 165, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 341, § 9, effective March 1.

16-2-105. Issuance of summons after complaint. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 193, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-105.

L. 98:

Entire section repealed, p. 946, § 2, effective May 27.

16-2-106. Content of summons and complaint.

A summons and complaint issued by a peace officer shall contain the name of the defendant, shall identify the offense charged, including a citation of the statute alleged to have been violated, shall contain a brief statement or description of the offense charged, including the date and approximate location thereof, and shall direct the defendant to appear before a specified county court at a stated date, time, and place.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 193, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-106.

16-2-107. Content of summons after complaint.

A summons issued out of the county court after a complaint is filed need contain only the date, time, and place of appearance of the defendant, but a copy of the complaint shall be attached to and served with the summons.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 194, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-107.

16-2-108. Place of appearance and trial.

The place at which the summons directs the defendant to appear shall be the place at which the court having jurisdiction over the matter customarily sits. It shall be a location at which the county court of the county in which the offense was alleged to have been committed sits regularly unless otherwise provided by this section. If the summons and complaint is issued by a peace officer and served personally upon the defendant by such peace officer, it may direct appearance at a location in which the county court of an adjoining county sits regularly if such a place is agreed to be more convenient by both the peace officer and the defendant. Costs and fines, to the extent provided by law, shall be retained by the county in which the matter is heard.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 194, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-108.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 429, § 5, effective May 24.

16-2-109. Service of summons.

A summons issued by the county court in a prosecution for a misdemeanor or petty offense may be served by giving a copy to the defendant personally or by leaving a copy at the defendant's usual place of abode with some person over the age of eighteen years residing therein or by mailing a copy to the defendant's last known address by certified mail, return receipt requested, not less than fourteen days prior to the time the defendant is required to appear. Service by mail must be complete upon the return of the receipt signed by the defendant. Personal service must be made by any disinterested party over the age of eighteen years.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 194, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-109.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 923, § 2, effective March 27.

L. 2012:

Entire section amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 842, § 57, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3160, § 166, effective March 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1229), ch. 68, p. 341, § 10, effective March 1.

16-2-110. Failure to appear.

If a person upon whom a summons or summons and complaint has been served pursuant to this part 1 fails to appear in person or by counsel at the place and time specified therein, a bench warrant may issue for his arrest.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 194, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-110.

L. 87:

Entire section amended, p. 603, § 1, effective July 1.

16-2-111. Admission to bail pending appearance.

Any person charged with a misdemeanor or petty offense by complaint filed in the county court shall be admitted to bail or pretrial release as provided in article 4 of this code. When the county judge or judges are not immediately available for purposes of admission to bail or pretrial release of persons arrested and brought to the county court or jail, on charges of committing a misdemeanor or petty offense, such persons may be admitted to bail or be given a pretrial release by an appropriate officer designated by court rule. Unless otherwise provided by statute or supreme court rule, the county court shall provide by rule for the conditions and circumstances under which an admission to bail or pretrial release will be granted pending appearance before the judge, but in no event shall any such rule require conditions or impose liabilities in excess of those required by this code for cases filed in the district court.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 194, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-111.

16-2-112. Arrest followed by a complaint.

If a peace officer makes an arrest without a warrant of a person for a misdemeanor or a petty offense, the arrested person shall be taken without unnecessary delay before the nearest available county or district judge. Thereafter, a complaint shall be filed immediately in the county court having jurisdiction of the offense and a copy thereof given to the defendant at or before the time he is arraigned. The provisions of this section are subject to the right of the arresting authority to release the arrested person pursuant to section 16-3-105.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 195, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-112.

16-2-113. Appearance of defendant before judge - subsequent procedure.

Upon appearance of the defendant before the judge in response to a summons or following arrest for a misdemeanor or a petty offense and in all proceedings thereafter unless otherwise provided in this code, the Colorado rules of criminal procedure are applicable. Prosecution may be conducted on the summons and complaint or the separate complaint if one has been filed. Trial may be held forthwith if the court calendar permits, immediate trial appears proper, and the parties do not request a continuance for good cause. Otherwise, the case shall be set for trial as soon as possible.

Upon appearance before a judge for an offense under section 42-2-138 (1)(d) or 42-4-1301 (1) or (2)(a), C.R.S., the judge may order conditions of the summons, including but not limited to drug and alcohol evaluation and treatment. For a violation of an order entered pursuant to this subsection (2), a court may revoke the summons, issue a warrant for the defendant's arrest, and impose bail pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of this title.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 195, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-113.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 785, § 2, effective July 1.

16-2-114. Appeals.

The defendant may appeal a judgment of the county court in a criminal action under simplified procedure to the district court of the county. To appeal, the defendant shall, within thirty-five days after the date of entry of the judgment or the denial of posttrial motions, whichever is later, file notice of appeal in the county court, post any advance costs that are required for the preparation of the record, and serve a copy of the notice of appeal upon the appellee. The defendant shall also, within such thirty-five days, docket the appeal in the district court and pay the docket fee. No motion for new trial or in arrest of judgment shall be required as a prerequisite to an appeal, but such motions may be made pursuant to applicable rule of the Colorado supreme court.

The notice of appeal shall state with particularity the alleged errors of the county court or other grounds relied upon for the appeal and shall include a stipulation or designation of the evidence and other proceedings which the appellant desires to have included in the record certified to the district court. If the appellant intends to urge upon appeal that the judgment or a finding or conclusion is unsupported by the evidence or is contrary to the evidence, the appellant shall include in the record a transcript of all evidence relevant to that finding or conclusion. The appellee shall have fourteen days after service upon him or her of the notice of appeal to file with the clerk of the county court and serve upon the appellant a designation of any additional parts of the transcript or record which he or she deems necessary. The advance cost of preparing the additional record shall be posted by the appellant with the clerk of the county court within seven days after service upon him or her of the appellee's designation, or the appeal will be dismissed. If the district court finds that any part of the additional record designated by the appellee was unessential to a complete understanding of the questions raised by the appeal, it shall order the appellee to reimburse the appellant for the cost advanced for the preparation of that part without regard to the outcome of the appeal.

Upon the filing of a notice of appeal and upon the posting of any advance costs by the appellant, as are required for the preparation of a record, unless the appellant is granted leave to proceed as an indigent, the clerk of the county court shall prepare and issue as soon as possible a record of the proceedings in the county court, including the summons and complaint or warrant, the separate complaint if any has been issued, and the judgment. The record shall also include a transcription or a joint stipulation of such part of the actual evidence and other proceedings as the parties designate. If the proceedings have been recorded electronically, the transcription of designated evidence and proceedings shall be prepared in the office of the clerk of the court, either by him or her or under his or her supervision, within forty-two days after the filing of the notice of appeal or within such additional time as may be granted by the county court. The clerk shall notify in writing the opposing parties of the completion of the record, and such parties shall have fourteen days within which to file objections. If none are received, the record shall be certified forthwith by the clerk. If objections are made, the parties shall be called for hearing and the objections settled by the county judge and the record then certified.

When the record has been duly certified and any additional fees therefor paid, it shall be filed with the clerk of the district court by the clerk of the county court, and the opposing parties shall be notified by the clerk of the county court of the filing.

A written brief setting out matters relied upon as constituting error and outlining any arguments to be made shall be filed in the district court by the appellant within twenty-one days after certification of the record. A copy of the appellant's brief shall be served upon the appellee. The appellee may file an answering brief within twenty-one days after such service. A reply brief may be filed within fourteen days after service of the answering brief. In the discretion of the district court, the time for filing briefs and answers may be extended.

Pending the docketing of the appeal, a stay of execution shall be granted by the county court upon request. If a sentence of imprisonment has been imposed, the defendant may be required to post bail, and if a fine and costs have been imposed, a deposit of the amount thereof or the posting of a bond for the payment thereof may be required by the county court. Upon a request for stay of execution made anytime after the docketing of the appeal, this action may be taken by the district court. Stays of execution granted by the county court or district court and, with the written consent of the sureties if any, bonds posted with such courts shall remain in effect until after final disposition of the appeal, unless modified by the district court.

If for any reason an adequate record cannot be certified to the district court, the case shall be tried de novo in that court. No action on appeal shall result in an increase in penalty.

Unless there is further review by the supreme court upon writ of certiorari pursuant to the rules of that court, after final disposition of the appeal the judgment on appeal entered by the district court shall be certified to the county court for action as directed by the district court, except in cases tried de novo by the district court or in cases in which the district court modifies the county court judgment, and, in such cases, the judgment on appeal shall be that of the district court and so enforceable.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 195, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-2-114.

L. 85:

(9) repealed, p. 572, § 12, effective November 14, 1986.

L. 2012:

(1), (2), (3), and (5) amended, (SB 12-175), ch. 208, p. 842, § 58, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (HB 13-1086), ch. 32, p. 77, § 2, effective July 1.